Utah statutes.
16-6a-115.   Liability to third parties.

The directors, officers, employees, and members of a nonprofit corporation are not personally liable in their capacity as directors, officers, employees, and members for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of a nonprofit corporation.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

